Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.506

Life sciences discovery fund—Limitation of liability.

Members of the governing board of trustees of the life sciences discovery fund authority and persons acting on behalf of the authority, while acting within the scope of their employment or agency, are not subject to personal liability resulting from carrying out the powers and duties conferred on them under former chapter 43.350 RCW. The state, the life sciences discovery fund authority, and the department are not liable for any loss, damage, harm, or other consequence resulting directly or indirectly from grants made by the authority or by any life sciences research funded by such grants.

[ 2019 c 83 s 3; 2005 c 424 s 6. Formerly RCW 43.350.050.]